foma/verb/ThamizhiFST-C3.foma
### Tamil.foma ###
read lexc ThamizhiVerbs-C3.lexc
define Lexicon;

define VM [ா | ி | ீ | ு | ூ | ெ |ே | ொ |ோ |ை];
define CON [க | ச | ட | த | ப | ற | ய | ர | ள | வ | ழ | ல | ங | ஞ | ண | ந | ம | ன ];

######### Rewrite rules
define C3R1 {ல்} -> 0 || _ "^" [{ன்}];
##This is an issue, முயலாத / வெல்லாத  - how to handle this?
define C3R2 {ல்} -> {ல்ல} || .#. CON VM _ "^" [{அ}|{ா}];
define C3R22 {ல்} -> {ல}  || _ "^" [{ு}|{அ}];
define C3R3 {ல்} -> {ல}  || _ "^" [{ா}];
# To Cleanup: remove morpheme boundaries
define Cleanup1 "அ" -> 0 || "^" _;
define Cleanup2 "^" -> 0;
define C3R4 {ல்த} -> {ன்ற};
define C3R5 {ல்து} -> {ன்று};
define C3R5 {விவ} -> {விப்ப};
define C3R5 {விவ} -> {விப்ப};

define ClassThreeGrammar 	Lexicon           	.o.
	  	C3R1		.o.
	  	C3R2		.o.
	  	C3R22		.o.
	  	C3R3		.o.
		Cleanup1		.o.
		Cleanup2		.o.
	  	C3R4		.o.
	  	C3R5;

regex ClassThreeGrammar;
